Utah statutes.
76-9-1007.   Determining an alien's immigration status -- Transfer or maintenance of information.

(1)  Except as limited by federal law, any state or local governmental agency is not restricted or prohibited in any way from sending, receiving, or maintaining information related to the lawful or unlawful immigration status of any person by communicating with any federal, state, or local governmental entity for any lawful purpose, including:

(a)  determining a person's eligibility for any public benefit, service, or license provided by any federal agency, by this state, or by any political subdivision of this state;

(b)  confirming a person's claim of residence or domicile if determination is required by state law or a judicial order issued pursuant to a civil or criminal proceeding in this state;

(c)  if the person is an alien, determining if the person is in compliance with the federal registration laws of Title II, Part 7, Immigration and Nationality Act; or

(d)  a valid request for verification of the citizenship or immigration status of any person pursuant to 8 U.S.C. Sec. 1373.

(2)  This section does not implement, authorize, or establish the federal REAL ID Act of 2005, P.L. 109-13, Division B; 119 Stat. 302, except as provided by Section 53-3-104.5, regarding limitations on the state implementation of the federal REAL ID Act.

